Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0869.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
PART 1
LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of
education for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the
following funds:
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 565.5
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 163,193,200
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 0
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 163,193,200
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 84,339,300
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 5,937,300
Total private revenues 2,552,900
Total other state restricted revenues 10,293,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 60,070,700
Sec. 102. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION/OFFICE OF THE
SUPERINTENDENT
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 11.0
Unclassified salaries--FTE positions 6.0 $ 1,225,900
Education commission of the states 120,800
State board of education, per diem payments 24,400
State board/superintendent operations--FTEs 11.0 2,549,100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,920,200
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal revenues 317,800
Special revenue funds:
Private foundations 80,000
Certification fees 853,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 2,669,400
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


Sec. 103. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORT
Full-time equated classified positions 44.6
Central support operations--FTEs 41.6 $ 6,914,200
Federal and private grants 3,006,200
Grant and contract operations--FTEs 3.0 1,913,000
Property management 4,194,800
Terminal leave payments 353,300
Training and orientation workshops 150,000
Worker's compensation 10,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 16,541,500
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal indirect revenues 2,367,900
Federal revenues 5,490,500
Special revenue funds:
Private foundations 1,006,200
Certification fees 638,900
Teacher testing fees 84,800
Training and orientation workshop fees 150,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 6,803,200
Sec. 104. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Information technology services and projects $ 5,090,600
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,090,600
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal indirect revenues 2,580,400
Federal revenues 70,600
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


Special revenue funds:
Certification fees 1,040,600
State general fund/general purpose $ 1,399,000
Sec. 105. SPECIAL EDUCATION SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 47.0
Special education operations--FTEs 47.0 $ 9,941,100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 9,941,100
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal revenues 9,125,600
Special revenue funds:
Private foundations 111,800
Certification fees 50,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 653,700
Sec. 106. MICHIGAN SCHOOLS FOR THE DEAF AND
BLIND
Full-time equated classified positions 82.0
ASL literacy resource $ 500,000
Camp Tuhsmeheta--FTE 1.0 1,004,900
Low incidence outreach program 1,000,000
Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind
operations--FTEs 81.0 13,893,400
Private gifts - blind 200,000
Private gifts - deaf 150,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 16,748,300
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal revenues 7,750,000
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


Special revenue funds:
Local cost sharing (schools for deaf/blind) 5,937,300
Gifts, bequests, and donations 1,354,900
Low incidence outreach fund 1,000,000
Student insurance revenue 206,100
State general fund/general purpose $ 500,000
Sec. 107. EDUCATOR EXCELLENCE
Full-time equated classified positions 46.0
Educator excellence operations--FTEs 45.0 $ 10,611,800
Educator recruitment and preparation programs--
FTE 1.0 1,691,100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 12,302,900
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal revenues 3,173,800
Special revenue funds:
Certification fees 4,251,100
Teacher testing fees 204,300
State general fund/general purpose $ 4,673,700
Sec. 108. SYSTEMS, EVALUATION, AND TECHNOLOGY
Full-time equated classified positions 19.0
Office of systems, evaluation, and technology
operations--FTEs 19.0 $ 3,562,600
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,562,600
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal indirect revenues 151,700
Federal revenues 2,184,100
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


Special revenue funds:
Certification fees 11,500
State general fund/general purpose $ 1,215,300
Sec. 109. STRATEGIC PLANNING AND IMPLEMENTATION
Full-time equated classified positions 6.0
Strategic planning and implementation
operations--FTEs 6.0 $ 1,226,700
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,226,700
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal revenues 652,900
State general fund/general purpose $ 573,800
Sec. 110. ADMINISTRATIVE LAW SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 2.0
Administrative law operations--FTEs 2.0 $ 1,430,800
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,430,800
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal revenues 573,200
Special revenue funds:
Certification fees 750,300
State general fund/general purpose $ 107,300
Sec. 111. ACCOUNTABILITY SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 56.6
Accountability services operations--FTEs 56.6 $ 15,159,100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 15,159,100
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


Federal revenues 13,179,900
State general fund/general purpose $ 1,979,200
Sec. 112. SCHOOL SUPPORT SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 92.6
Adolescent and school health $ 338,800
Office of health and safety--FTEs 23.0 3,052,100
School support services operation--FTEs 69.6 13,636,300
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 17,027,200
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal revenues 13,422,700
Special revenue funds:
Commodity distribution fees 150,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 3,454,500
Sec. 113. EDUCATIONAL SUPPORTS
Full-time equated classified positions 86.7
Educational supports operations--FTEs 86.7 $ 18,426,800
School board member training 150,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 18,576,800
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal revenues 13,411,700
Special revenue funds:
Certification fees 602,400
State general fund/general purpose $ 4,562,700
Sec. 114. CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION
Full-time equated classified positions 23.0
Career and technical education operations--FTEs 23.0 $ 5,904,900
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,904,900
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal revenues 4,140,100
State general fund/general purpose $ 1,764,800
Sec. 115. LIBRARY OF MICHIGAN
Full-time equated classified positions 34.0
Library of Michigan operations--FTEs 32.0 $ 5,176,400
Library services and technology program--FTE 1.0 5,631,900
Michigan eLibrary--FTE 1.0 1,853,400
Renaissance zone reimbursements 1,830,000
State aid to libraries 16,567,700
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 31,059,400
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal revenues 5,631,900
Special revenue funds:
Library fees 300,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 25,127,500
Sec. 116. PARTNERSHIP DISTRICT SUPPORT
Full-time equated classified positions 15.0
Partnership district support operations--FTEs 15.0 $ 3,701,100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,701,100
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal revenues 114,500
State general fund/general purpose $ 3,586,600
Sec. 117. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


Education support services $ 1,000,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,000,000
Appropriated from:
State general fund/general purpose $ 1,000,000

PART 2
PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027
GENERAL SECTIONS
Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the
state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is
$69,636,700.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources
to be paid to local units of government is $18,547,700.00. The
following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which
spending to local units of government will occur:
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
Renaissance zone reimbursements $ 1,830,000
School board member training 150,000
State aid to libraries 16,567,700
TOTAL $ 18,547,700
Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are
subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101
to 18.1594.
Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1:
(a) "Department" means the department of education.
(b) "DHHS" means the department of health and human services.
(c) "District" means a local school district as that term is
defined in section 6 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


380.6, or a public school academy as that term is defined in
section 5 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.5.
(d) "FTE" means full-time equated.
(e) "HHS" means the United States Department of Health and
Human Services.
(f) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house
appropriations subcommittees on the department budget, the senate
and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and
the state budget office.
Sec. 204. A department or agency shall use the internet to
fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each
report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each
required report in a single archivable location on the department's
or agency's michigan.gov website not later than the due date
required for each report. In addition to placing all reports
required in the current fiscal year on the department's or agency's
website, the department or agency shall maintain on its website all
reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by
fiscal year in the same single archivable location. The department
or agency shall also transmit all required reports for the current
fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other
required recipients by email.
Sec. 205. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the
following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1:
(a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign
goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of
comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are
available.
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


(b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are
competitively priced and of comparable quality.
(c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and
operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of
comparable quality.
Sec. 206. The department shall not take disciplinary action
against an employee of the department for communicating with a
member of the legislature or legislative staff, unless the
communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising
its authority as provided by law.
Sec. 207. Consistent with section 217 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare
a report on out-of-state travel expenses not later than January 1.
The report must list all travel by classified and unclassified
employees outside this state in the previous fiscal year that was
funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the
department's budget. The department shall submit the report to the
standard report recipients and to the senate and house of
representatives appropriations committees. The report must include
all of the following information:
(a) The dates of each travel occurrence.
(b) The total transportation and related expenses of each
travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general
fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal
revenues, and other revenues.
Sec. 209. Not later than December 15, the state budget office
shall prepare and submit a report that provides for estimates of
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the
close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the
projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation
lapses by major departmental program or program areas. The state
budget office shall submit the report to the standard report
recipients and the chairpersons of the senate and house
appropriations committees.
Sec. 210. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for
federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $400,000.00 for state
restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under
this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have
been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section
393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $250,000.00 for local
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,500,000.00 for private
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
Sec. 211. A department or agency shall cooperate with the
department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a
searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that
includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for each
department or agency:
(a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category.
(b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit.
(c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor,
including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and
payment description.
Sec. 212. Not later than 14 days after the release of the
executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate
with the state budget office to provide an annual report on
estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund
projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the
previous 2 fiscal years. The report must be submitted to the
standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate
and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 214. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to
restrict or impede a marginalized community's access to government
resources, programs, or facilities.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, local governments
shall report any action or policy that attempts to restrict or
interfere with the duties of the local health officer.
Sec. 215. To the extent permissible under the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, the state
superintendent of public instruction shall take all reasonable
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


steps to ensure that geographically disadvantaged business
enterprises compete for and perform contracts to provide services,
supplies, or both. The state superintendent of public instruction
shall strongly encourage firms with which the department contracts
to subcontract with certified geographically disadvantaged business
enterprises for services, supplies, or both.
Sec. 216. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on
the number of full-time equated positions in pay status by civil
service classification, including a comparison by line item of the
number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds
appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated
positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting
period. The report must be submitted to the senate and house
appropriations committees and to the standard report recipients.
Sec. 217. If the state administrative board, acting under
section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount
appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent
resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and
serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the
particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution.
Sec. 218. The department shall receive and retain copies of
all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department
shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term
and long-term retention of records. The department may
electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required
by federal and state guidelines.
Sec. 219. Not later than April 1, the department shall report
on each specific policy change made to implement a public act
affecting the department that took effect during the previous
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act
that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit
the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and
house appropriations committees, and to the joint committee on
administrative rules.
Sec. 220. By April 1, the department shall provide to the
standard report recipients a copy of the department's annual
strategic plan prepared in compliance with section 363 of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1363. The strategic
plan must include the mission, vision, goals, strategies, and
performance measures of the department.
Sec. 221. The department shall report on any court settlement
that may require further legislative review of state statutory
programs or regulations.
Sec. 222. To the extent possible, the department shall not
expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized
work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted.
Sec. 223. Not later than 6 months after the state budget
office issues work project letters, a department or agency shall
submit an annual report that summarizes all work project accounts.
The report must include all of the following:
(a) A list of all work project accounts.
(b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts
expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each
account.
(c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously
designated work project accounts, the name and description of the
work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed
amounts.
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


Sec. 224. Total authorized appropriations from all sources
under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027 are estimated at $6,940,300.00. From this amount, total
department appropriations for pension-related legacy costs are
estimated at $6,940,300.00. Total department appropriations for
retiree health care legacy costs are estimated at $0.00.
Sec. 226. (1) The department shall maximize utilization of its
in-person state workforce. The department shall prioritize
occupancy utilization of office space for each division within the
department. Employees with job responsibilities that require the
employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall
be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on
the timesheet were actually worked.
(2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by
the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization
and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure in-person work is
optimized and occupancy rates are 80% or higher, subject to market
conditions.
(3) The department shall adhere to the rules and regulations
of civil service, which state that the standard biweekly work
period for a full-time employee in the classified service is the
equivalent of 80 hours of work. The department shall establish
policies and processes to ensure all employees are working their
jobs during agreed-upon business hours.
Sec. 227. A department or agency that receives an
appropriation under this part or part 1 must provide an annual
report to the standard report recipients detailing federal policy
changes that do, or are expected to do, any of the following:
(a) Affect the operations of the department, including
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


reductions in federal revenue. For federal revenue reductions, the
annual report must detail the impact on the department or agency
and residents of this state, including, but not limited to, all of
the following information:
(i) The amount of additional state revenue required to replace
the lost federal revenue.
(ii) The services the department or agency will have to reduce
or eliminate due to the lost revenue.
(iii) The anticipated fiscal impact on residents of this state.
(b) Affect an industry, community, population, or other group
regulated or served by, or that otherwise engages with, the
department or agency.
(c) Create a regulatory gap that could negatively impact the
public.
(d) Increase the department's or agency's costs.
(e) Reduce or eliminate a program that provides services to
residents of this state.
Sec. 229. (1) Not later than 30 days after enactment of this
act, the legislature shall provide to the state budget office a
jointly-agreed-upon list of legislatively directed spending items
funded in part 1 as defined in sections 364 and 364a of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a.
The list must include all information and documents pertaining to
the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections
364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL
18.1364 and 18.1364a.
(2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency
administering the grant shall post a report in a publicly
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


accessible location on its website beginning March 15 of the
current fiscal year. The department or agency shall update the
report and shall post an updated report not later than June 15 of
the current fiscal year and again not later than September 15 of
the current fiscal year. The department shall include in the report
the most comprehensive information the department has available at
the time of posting for grants awarded.
Sec. 230. Not later than November 15, the department shall
disclose on a publicly accessible website private and other third-
party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year.
The report must include the amount and source of funding received,
the purpose for which funding was expended, and the amount of any
remaining funds. The report must be submitted to the standard
report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate and house
appropriations committees.
Sec. 231. The state budget director shall take steps to ensure
that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under
the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. Any state fiscal
recovery funds that would otherwise lapse after September 30, 2026
are automatically reappropriated for the same purpose as originally
authorized and available for expenditure through December 31, 2026
and any subsequent financial close out period.
Sec. 232. (1) The state budget director shall take steps to
ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state
under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. The state budget
director may reallocate appropriated funds for the purpose of fully
utilizing state fiscal recovery funds that are in jeopardy of not
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


meeting the expenditure deadline for reasons that may include, but
are not limited to, completed projects coming in under budget or
funds unable to be fully used by subrecipients. The state budget
director shall reallocate any of the funds reallocated under this
subsection to the programs or purposes specified in this section.
Any funds reallocated are unappropriated and immediately
reappropriated for the following purposes:
(a) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of corrections.
(b) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of state police.
(2) All applicable guidance, implementation, and reporting
provisions of the American rescue plan of 2021, Public Law 117-2,
must be followed for state fiscal recovery funds reallocated and
reappropriated under subsection (1).
(3) The state budget director shall notify the senate and
house appropriations committees not later than 10 business days
after making any reallocations under subsection (1). The
notification must include the authorized program under which funds
were originally appropriated, the amount of the reallocation, the
program, programs, or purpose for which the funds are being
reallocated, the department to which the funds are being
reallocated under subsection (1), and the amount reallocated to
each program or purpose.

DEPARTMENT-SPECIFIC GENERAL SECTIONS
Sec. 301. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


department shall provide through the internet the state board of
education agenda and all supporting documents, and shall notify the
state budget director and the senate and house fiscal agencies that
the agenda and supporting documents are available on the internet,
at the time the agenda and supporting documents are provided to
state board of education members.
Sec. 302. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department may assist DHHS, other departments, intermediate school
districts, and local school districts to secure reimbursement for
eligible services provided in Michigan schools from the federal
Medicaid program. The department may submit reports of direct
expenses related to this effort to DHHS for reimbursement.
Sec. 303. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall do both of the following:
(a) Post on its website a link to the federal Institute of
Education Sciences' What Works Clearinghouse.
(b) Disseminate knowledge about the What Works Clearinghouse
to districts and intermediate school districts so that it may be
used to improve reading proficiency for pupils in grades K to 3.
Sec. 304. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall coordinate with the other departments to
streamline state services and resources, reduce duplication, and
increase efficiency, including, but not limited to, all of the
following:
(a) Working with the department of treasury to coordinate with
the financial independence team and overseeing deficit districts.
(b) Working with DHHS and the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential to coordinate with early
childhood programs and overseeing child care providers.
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


Sec. 305. (1) As a condition of receiving appropriations in
part 1, the department shall, in collaboration with DHHS, promote
and support initiatives in schools and other educational
organizations that include, but are not limited to, training for
educators, teachers, and other personnel in school settings for all
of the following:
(a) Using trauma-informed practices.
(b) Age-appropriate education and information on human
trafficking.
(c) Age-appropriate education and information on sexual abuse
prevention.
(2) If requested by the department, the department of state
police and the department of attorney general shall consult with
the department in the promotion and support of initiatives in
schools and other educational organizations under subsection (1).
Sec. 306. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall ensure that the most recently issued report of
regional in-demand occupations issued by the department of
technology, management, and budget is distributed in electronic or
paper form to all high schools in each school district,
intermediate school district, and public school academy.

STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION/OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT
Sec. 351. (1) The department may use the appropriations from
the state board of education, per diem payments in part 1 for per
diem payments to the state board members for meetings at which a
quorum is present or for performing official business authorized by
the state board. The per diem payments are set at the following
rates:
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


(a) State board of education - president - $110.00 per day.
(b) State board of education - member other than president -
$100.00 per day.
(2) The department shall not pay a state board of education
member a per diem for more than 30 days per year.

SPECIAL EDUCATION SERVICES
Sec. 401. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for special
education operations, the department shall use $100,000.00 to
design and distribute to all parents and legal guardians of a
student with a disability the following information:
(a) Federal and state mandates regarding the rights and
protections of students with disabilities, including, but not
limited to, individualized education programs to ensure that
parents and legal guardians are fully informed about laws, rules,
procedural safeguards, and problem-solving options.
(b) Any other information the department determines is
necessary to allow parents and legal guardians to provide
meaningful input in collaboration with districts to develop and
implement an individualized education program.

MICHIGAN SCHOOLS FOR THE DEAF AND BLIND
Sec. 451. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the employees
at the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind who work on a
school-year basis are considered annual employees for purposes of
service credits, retirement, and insurance benefits.
Sec. 452. For each student enrolled at the Michigan Schools
for the Deaf and Blind, the department shall assess the
intermediate school district of residence 100% of the cost of
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


operating the student's instructional program, excluding room and
board related costs and the cost of weekend transportation between
the school and the student's home.
Sec. 456. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind may promote its residential
program as a possible appropriate option for children who are deaf
or hard of hearing or who are blind or visually impaired. From the
funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and
Blind shall distribute information detailing its services to all
intermediate school districts in this state.
(2) If an intermediate school district knows that a child in
the district is deaf or hard of hearing or blind or visually
impaired, the intermediate school district shall provide to the
parents of the child the literature distributed by the Michigan
Schools for the Deaf and Blind to intermediate school districts
under subsection (1).
(3) Parents will continue to have a choice regarding the
educational placement of their deaf or hard-of-hearing children.
Sec. 457. Revenue received by the Michigan Schools for the
Deaf and Blind from gifts, bequests, and donations that is
unexpended at the end of the state fiscal year may be carried over
to the succeeding fiscal year and does not revert to the general
fund.
Sec. 458. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for the low
incidence outreach fund are appropriated from money collected by
the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind and the low incidence
outreach program for providing qualified services and may be used
for any expenses necessary to provide the qualified services. Any
money that is unexpended at the end of the current fiscal year does
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


not revert to the general fund and may be carried forward into the
succeeding fiscal year.
(2) As used in this section, "qualified services" means any of
the following:
(a) Document reproduction and services.
(b) Conducting conferences, workshops, and training classes.
(c) Providing specialized equipment, facilities, and software.
Sec. 459. When conducting a due process hearing resulting from
a parent's appeal of that parent's child's individualized education
program team's decision on the child's educational placement, a
state administrative law judge shall consider designating the
Michigan School for the Deaf as 1 of the options for the least
restrictive environment under federal law for the parent's child
who is deaf, deafblind, or hard of hearing.
Sec. 460. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for ASL
literacy resources, the department shall expend the funds to comply
with all requirements in section 1705 of the revised school code,
1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1705.

EDUCATOR EXCELLENCE
Sec. 501. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for educator
excellence, the department shall maintain certificate revocation
and felony conviction files of educational personnel.
Sec. 503. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall, if requested by the Michigan Virtual Learning
Research Institute, consult with the Michigan Virtual Learning
Research Institute and external stakeholders in connection with the
department's implementation and administration of professional
development training described in section 35a of the state school
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1635a, including, but not
limited to, the online training of educators of pupils in grades K
to 3 described in that section.
Sec. 504. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for educator
recruitment and preparation programs, the department shall award
$1,000,000.00 to districts for both of the following:
(a) Educator preparation program tuition, program fees,
testing fees, and substitute permit costs for any individual
employed in grades pre-K to 12 working toward certification or an
additional endorsement.
(b) Program costs associated with hands-on learning
experiences for students in grades 6 to 12 interested in the field
of education, with supervision and mentoring from educators who are
champions of, and committed to, the success of the profession.
Sec. 505. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for educator
recruitment and preparation programs, not less than $190,000.00 and
not fewer than 1.0 FTE position is allocated for educator
recruitment and preparation programs.
Sec. 506. Revenue received from teacher testing fees that is
unexpended at the end of the current fiscal year may be carried
over to the succeeding fiscal year and does not revert to the
general fund.
Sec. 507. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall adopt a teacher certification test that ensures
that all newly certified elementary teachers have the skills to
deliver evidence-based literacy instruction grounded in the science
of reading. The department may use teacher certification or teacher
testing fee revenue to the extent allowable under law to implement
this section, or may pass along increased testing fees to teachers
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


as allowable and appropriate.

SCHOOL SUPPORT SERVICES
Sec. 601. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for adolescent
and school health, the department shall use the funds to replace
federal funding reductions from the HHS - Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention to the department and section 39a(2)(a) of
the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1639a.
Sec. 602. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for school
board member training, there is appropriated $150,000.00 for school
board member training. The department shall approve 1 or more
training programs for school board members that include courses of
instruction for school board members in 1 or more of the following
topic areas:
(a) Conflicts of interest, including, but not limited to, the
application of section 1203 of the revised school code, 1976 PA
451, MCL 380.1203.
(b) Labor relations, including, but not limited to, a school
board's role in collective bargaining agreements in 1947 PA 336,
MCL 423.201 to 423.217, and in other laws related to employment.
(c) Education law, including, but not limited to, the revised
school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1 to 380.1852, the state school
aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1601 to 388.1896, the open
meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275, and 1937 (Ex Sess)
PA 4, MCL 38.71 to 38.191, dealing with teacher tenure.
(d) School finance, including, but not limited to, the
creation and management of school district budgets.
(e) Board governance, including, but not limited to, roles and
responsibilities, parliamentary procedure, and best practices.
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


(f) Implicit bias training.
(g) Rater reliability training.
(2) On completion of an eligible training program, a school
board member may apply for reimbursement for the cost of the
eligible training program through the board member's local
district, up to $100.00 per course. The department may determine
the form and manner of the application to reimburse the district
for the cost.
(3) The department shall create a process for the provider of
a course in a topic listed in subsection (1) to apply to the
department to have the course approved and be eligible for a school
board member to be reimbursed for completing that course as
provided under subsection (2).
(4) As used in this section:
(a) "Eligible training program" means a training program that
is approved under subsection (1).
(b) "School board member" means a member of the board of a
school district or intermediate school district or a member of the
board of directors of a public school academy in this state.
Sec. 604. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, not less
than $159,500.00 and not fewer than 1.0 FTE position shall provide
technical assistance to all eligible districts to make them
effective at using Medicaid dollars for mental health.
(2) As used in this section, "eligible district" means a
school district or intermediate school district that receives
funding under section 31n of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979
PA 94, MCL 388.1631n.

EDUCATIONAL SUPPORTS
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


Sec. 702. From the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not less than $1,000,000.00 for
implementation costs associated with programs for early childhood
literacy funded under section 35a of the state school aid act of
1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1635a.

CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION
Sec. 750. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for career and
technical education operations, the department shall develop and
implement a reporting mechanism for school districts to report on
career and technical education participation and workforce
development participation. The department shall prepare and submit
a report to the standard report recipients detailing all of the
following:
(a) The number of students participating in career and
technical education programs.
(b) The number of students in the graduating class of the
current school year that took at least 1 career and technical
education course while in high school.
(c) The number of students in the graduating class of the
previous school year that enrolled in a postsecondary workforce
development program in the current school year.

LIBRARY OF MICHIGAN
Sec. 801. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for library
fees are appropriated from money collected by the library of
Michigan for providing qualified services and may be used for any
expenses necessary to provide the qualified services. Any money
that is unexpended at the end of the current fiscal year does not
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


lapse to the general fund and may be carried forward into the
succeeding fiscal year.
(2) As used in this section, "qualified services" means any of
the following:
(a) Document reproduction and services.
(b) Conducting conferences, workshops, and training classes.
(c) Providing specialized equipment, facilities, and software.
Sec. 804. (1) The department shall use the funds appropriated
in part 1 for renaissance zone reimbursements to reimburse public
libraries under section 12 of the Michigan renaissance zone act,
1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2692, for taxes levied in 2026. The department
shall allocate the funds not later than 60 days after the
department of treasury certifies to the department and to the state
budget director that the department of treasury has received all
necessary information to properly determine the amounts due to each
eligible recipient.
(2) If the amount appropriated under this section is not
sufficient to fully pay obligations under this section, the
department shall prorate payments on an equal basis among all
eligible recipients.

ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 1000. (1) From the appropriation in part 1 for education
support services, $500,000.00 shall be added to the state aid for
libraries line item in part 1 for fiscal year 2026-2027 and shall
be disbursed to Michigan public and cooperative libraries pursuant
to the state aid to public libraries act, 1977 PA 89, MCL 397.551
to 397.576. The remaining $500,000.00 shall be allocated to the
department's eLibrary services pursuant to subsection (2).
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak


(2) The unexpended appropriations in part 1 for state aid to
libraries are designated as a work project appropriation. Any
unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the
fiscal year and shall be available for expenditure for the project
under this section until the project has been completed. The
following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the project is to expand the Michigan
eLibrary's free online access to articles, books, and other
research information to the public.
(b) The project will be accomplished utilizing state resources
and contracts.
(c) The total estimated completion cost of the project is
$500,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date for the project is September
30, 2030.
Final Page
BEG S06105'26 (S-1) ewybak